District of Columbia statutes.
26-215

Purchase of real property.

Such corporation shall not invest its fund in any real estate except what is necessary for the conduct of its business, but may purchase such property at sales made upon foreclosure of mortgages or in satisfaction of judgments or other liens held by it; provided, that such property so purchased be sold within a reasonable time thereafter.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1300, ch. 854, § 700

History

1981 Ed., § 26-515.
1973 Ed., § 26-414.

Prior Codifications